District of Columbia statutes.
1-309.02

Advisory Neighborhood Commission areas.

There are hereby established in the District of Columbia Advisory Neighborhood Commission areas, the boundaries of which shall be as depicted on the maps of the District of Columbia annexed to and made a part of this part.

Oct. 10, 1975, D.C. Law 1-21, § 3, 22 DCR 2066
Oct. 30, 1975, D.C. Law 1-27, § 4, 22 DCR 2472
Sept. 26, 1984, D.C. Law 5-111, § 2(a), 31 DCR 3952
This section is referenced in § 1-309.03.
1981 Ed., § 1-253.
1973 Ed., § 1-171a-1.
“Maps of the District of Columbia annexed to and made a part of this act,” referred to in this section, are set forth in 22 DCR 2074 to 2081.
District boundaries established: Pursuant to §§ 1-309.03 and 1-1011.01, § 2 of D.C. Law 5-13 established the boundaries of both Advisory Neighborhood Commission areas and single-member districts within Advisory Neighborhood Commission areas.